Wyoming, session 2025, HB0102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-601, 9-5-101(a),
22-2-105(a)(ii)(intro) and 22-6-117(a)(iv) are amended to
read:

9-1-601. Appointment; term; removal; special
assistant for legislative affairs; qualifications.

(a) Until the term of office of the attorney general
commences following the 2026 general election, the attorney
general of the state of Wyoming shall be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate in
accordance with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103 and may be
removed by the governor as provided in W.S. 9-1-202.
Beginning at the 2026 general election, the attorney
general shall be elected in a statewide election for a term
of four (4) years.

(b) Prior to the 2026 general election, if a newly
elected governor appoints an attorney general to take
office prior to or during the legislative session next
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
following the governor's election, the newly appointed
attorney general designee shall become a member of the
attorney general's staff to serve as a special assistant to
the governor for legislative affairs. When the legislative
session adjourns the attorney general's term of office
shall terminate.

(c) Prior to his To be eligible for appointment or
election, the attorney general shall have been a practicing
attorney for at least four (4) years,. At the date of
appointment, he shall be in good standing in the courts of
record of this state and shall be a resident and elector of
the state.

9-5-101. State building commission; composition;
general powers and duties; conflicts of interest.

(a) The five (5) elected state officers governor,
secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer and
state superintendent of public instruction shall constitute
the state building commission. The governor shall be
chairman of the commission, but in his absence from any
meeting, one (1) of the members may act as chairman, and
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
shall preside at the meeting. All votes taken to decide the
commission's final action on any matter shall be recorded.

22-2-105. Terms of office and offices voted on at
general elections.

(a) The terms of office and offices voted on at
general elections are as follows:

(ii) Four Year Term. - At the general election
in 1974 and in every fourth (4th) year thereafter, there
shall be elected the following officers: one (1) governor,
one (1) secretary of state, one (1) state treasurer, one
(1) state auditor, one (1) superintendent of public
instruction, county clerks, county treasurers, county
assessors, county coroners, county and prosecuting
attorneys, district attorneys, sheriffs, clerks of the
district court. At every general election there shall be
elected the necessary member or members of the Wyoming
senate and county commissioners. At the general election in
2026 and every fourth year thereafter, there shall be
elected an attorney general. The question of retention of a
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
circuit court judge or a magistrate of the circuit court
shall be submitted:

22-6-117. Order of listing offices in partisan
elections.

(a) The major party primary and general partisan
election ballots shall contain the offices to be voted on
in the following order:

(iv) Candidates for governor, secretary of
state, state auditor, state treasurer, and superintendent
of public instruction and, beginning at the 2026 primary
and general election, the attorney general;

Section 2. W.S. 1-26-509(k), 1-31-103, 1-35-103(a),
1-35-104, 7-3-102, 7-22-101(a)(vi), 7-22-102(a), (b),
(c)(intro) and (d), 7-22-108(a), 8-1-102(a)(xii),
8-2-101(a)(vi), 9-1-101(b), 9-1-211(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and by renumbering (vi) through (viii) as
(vii) through (ix), 9-1-602, 9-1-603(b) and (c), 9-1-604,
9-1-605(b) through (d), 9-1-608(a) and (b), 9-1-611(c),
9-1-618(b)(i), 9-1-633(a) and (b)(intro), 9-1-636(b) and
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(c)(intro), 9-2-3204(h)(i), 9-3-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (viii), 9-4-218(a)(iii), 9-13-102(a)(xii)(A) and
(xvi), 9-13-108(a)(intro), 9-14-101, 9-14-102(c),
18-3-902(a), 22-18-111(a)(intro) and (i), 28-1-115(g)(ii),
28-12-102(c) and by creating a new subsection (d),
35-7-1004, 35-11-1507(a) and 35-21-110(a) are amended to
read:

1-26-509. Negotiations; scope of efforts to purchase.

(k) Attorney's fees and other expenses awarded under
this section from a public entity to a condemnee shall be
reported by the public entity which paid the fees, to the
Wyoming attorney general within sixty (60) days of the
award. The Wyoming attorney general shall collect this data
and report annually to the governor joint revenue interim
committee and joint judiciary interim committee on the
amount of all taxpayer funded fee awards, beginning July
31, 2014. The report shall identify the name of each party
to whom an award was made, the name of each counsel of
record representing each party to whom an award was made,
the public agency which paid each award and the total
amount of each award.
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396

1-31-103. Commencement of action.

The attorney general or a county attorney shall may
commence an action when directed by the governor, supreme
court or legislature, or when upon complaint or otherwise
he has good reason to believe that such an action can be
established by proof. The attorney general may commence an
action when requested by the governor, supreme court or
legislature. A county attorney shall commence an action
when directed by the governor, supreme court or
legislature.

1-35-103. Violation of state contracts to be reported
to attorney general; investigation; action to recover
damages; employment of special assistants.

(a) Any officer, board or commission of the state of
Wyoming, or their legal counsel, responsible for the
enforcement of any contract between the state of Wyoming
and any person, having reason to believe that there has
been a violation of the terms of the contract to the damage
of the state of Wyoming, shall report the matter to the
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
attorney general of the state of Wyoming. The attorney
general shall make such investigation of the matter as is
necessary. Upon completion of the investigation and finding
of probable damages to the state of Wyoming, the attorney
general may bring suit in any court of competent
jurisdiction to recover all damages that the state of
Wyoming may have incurred by reason of the breach of
contract, or for any money or other property that may be
due on the contract. Subject to the governor's approval he
The attorney general may employ specially qualified
assistants or counsel to aid in any investigation of such
action.

1-35-104. Actions under control of attorney general;
settlement or compromise with approval of governor.

The attorney general shall control all investigations and
actions instituted and conducted in on behalf of the state
as provided in W.S. 1-35-103 and has full discretionary
powers to prosecute all investigations and litigation and,
with the approval of the governor, to settle, compromise or
dismiss the actions.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
7-3-102. Appointment of attorney general to represent
state on joint commissions.

The governor shall appoint the attorney general is hereby
appointed as the commissioner who shall represent Wyoming
upon any joint commission created by Wyoming and any one
(1) or more states for the purpose of negotiating and
entering into agreements or compacts for cooperative effort
and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime and in the
enforcement of the respective criminal laws and policies of
Wyoming and any other state and for the establishment of
agencies deemed desirable for making effective any
agreement or compact.

7-22-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(vi) "Five (5) Six (6) state elected officials"
means the governor, secretary of state, state auditor,
state treasurer, attorney general and superintendent of
public instruction;

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
7-22-102. Authority to contract; general conditions.

(a) The state or a local government may contract with
private entities for the construction, lease (as lessor or
lessee), acquisition, improvement, operation, maintenance,
purchase or management of facilities and services as
provided in this article, but only after receiving the
consent of the five (5) six (6) state elected officials as
to site, number of beds and classifications of inmates or
prisoners to be housed in the facility.

(b) No contract shall be entered into or renewed
unless the contracting governmental entity, with the
concurrence of the five (5) six (6) state elected
officials, determines the contract offers substantial cost
savings to the contracting governmental entity and at least
the same quality of services provided by the state or by
similar local governments.

(c) After receiving the majority consent of the five
(5) six (6) state elected officials as to the site, number
of beds and classifications of inmates or prisoners to be
housed in the facility, the state or the local government
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
may contract with private entities for the construction,
lease (as lessor or lessee), acquisition, improvement,
operation, maintenance, purchase or management of
facilities, either:

(d) The state or the local government may reject or
return prisoners from outside the state. Prisoners or
inmates of out-of-state, nonfederal jurisdictions shall not
be incarcerated in any facility operated by a local
government entity under this article without the consent of
the majority of the five (5) six (6) state elected
officials. of this state. At no time shall the number of
prisoners from out-of-state, nonfederal jurisdictions
incarcerated in a facility operated by a local government
entity under this article exceed thirty percent (30%) of
the capacity of that facility. Any out-of-state, nonfederal
prisoner shall be returned to the jurisdiction of origin to
be released from custody by them, outside the state of
Wyoming at the appropriate time.

7-22-108. Monitoring; right of access.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(a) The contracting governmental entity at the
contractor's expense, shall employ an individual to be
responsible for monitoring all aspects of the private
contractor's performance under a contract for the operation
of a facility pursuant to W.S. 7-22-102. The individual
employed as contract monitor shall be qualified to perform
this function by reason of education, training and
experience as determined by the five (5) six (6) state
elected officials. At a minimum, the contract monitor shall
have completed at least the same training required by this
article for detention officers and shall have served a
minimum of three (3) years as a detention officer. The
monitor, with the approval of the contracting governmental
entity, shall appoint staff as necessary to assist in
monitoring at the facility, which staff shall be at the
contractor's expense and will be solely responsible to the
contract monitor. The monitor or his designee shall be
provided an on-site work area by the contractor, shall be
on-site on a daily basis, and shall have access to all
areas of the facility and to inmates and staff at all
times. The contractor shall provide any and all data,
reports and other materials that the monitor determines are
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
necessary to carry out monitoring responsibilities under
this section.

8-1-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in the statutes unless the legislature
clearly specifies a different meaning or interpretation or
the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(xii) "Elected state official" means the
governor, secretary of state, state auditor, state
treasurer, attorney general and superintendent of public
instruction;

8-2-101. Distribution of statutes, supplements and
session laws.

(a) Statutes, supplements and session laws shall be
distributed as provided by contract with the publisher or
as directed by the management council, to the following,
without charge:

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(vi) One (1) copy to each of the five (5) six
(6) elected state officers officials;

9-1-101. Location of seat of government; residence of
state officials; deputies authorized; state superintendent
of public instruction physical office designation.

(b) The governor, secretary of state, state
treasurer, state auditor, attorney general and state
superintendent of public instruction shall reside and
maintain their offices at the seat of government.

9-1-211. Vacancy in office of governor; successor
designated; order of succession; proclamation on
succession.

(a) If the governor is removed, dies, resigns or is
unable to act, the state officer appearing highest on the
following list who satisfies all constitutional
qualifications for governor and is not under impeachment by
the house of representatives shall act as governor until
the disability of the governor is removed or a new governor
is elected and qualified:
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396

(vi) Attorney general;

(vi)(vii) State superintendent of public
instruction;

(vii)(viii) Vice-president of the senate;

(viii)(ix) Speaker pro tem of the house of
representatives.

9-1-602. Vacancy in office.

In case of A vacancy in the office of attorney general the
governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the
vacancy in accordance with the provisions of be filled as
provided by W.S. 28-12-101(b) 22-18-111, except the vacancy
shall be subject to senate confirmation as provided in W.S.
28-12-101 and 28-12-102.

9-1-603. Duties generally; retention of qualified
practicing attorneys; matters in which county or state is
party or has interest; assistance to county and district
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
attorneys in felony trials; coordination of county and
school safety activities.

(b) With the approval of the governor The attorney
general may retain qualified practicing attorneys to
prosecute fee-generating suits for the state if expertise
in a particular field is desirable.

(c) Upon the failure or refusal of any district or
county attorney to act in any criminal or civil case or
matter in which the county, state or any agency thereof is
a party, or has an interest, the attorney general may, at
the request of the board of county commissioners of the
county involved or of the district judge of the judicial
district involved, act on behalf of the county, state or
any agency thereof, if after a thorough investigation the
action is deemed advisable by the attorney general. The
cost of investigation and the cost of any prosecution
arising therefrom shall be paid out of the general fund of
the county where the investigation and prosecution take
place. The attorney general shall may also, upon direction
of the governor, investigate any matter in any county of
the state in which the county, state or any agency thereof
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
may be interested. After investigation, the attorney
general shall submit a report of the investigation to the
governor and to the district or county attorney of each
county involved and may take such other action as he the
attorney general deems appropriate.

9-1-604. Office in state capital; private practice
prohibited; exception.

The attorney general shall keep an office in the state
capital, shall not open an office elsewhere and shall not
engage in any private practice except to consummate
business pending at the time of his election or appointment
if not in conflict with the duties of his office.

9-1-605. Approval of public securities and official
bonds; water rights proceedings; investigation of
misconduct of county official; commencement of action.

(b) Under the direction of the governor The attorney
general shall institute and pursue proceedings to maintain
the state's and its citizens' rights in the waters of
interstate streams.
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396

(c) Upon representation to the governor attorney
general of misconduct or malfeasance in office or the
commission of a crime by any county officer in the state
and if the governor attorney general believes the ends of
justice demand or the matter will not be properly
investigated and prosecuted by the sheriff and by the
district attorney of the county, the governor may direct
the attorney general to may investigate the case.

(d) Upon completion of the investigation, the
attorney general shall report the results of the
investigation and his recommendations to the governor. If
the governor and the attorney general determine that the
attorney general should may institute a criminal or civil
action, as the attorney general shall commence the action
deems appropriate. The attorney general shall have the
authority and duty vested in district attorneys in this
state.

9-1-608. Assistant attorneys general.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(a) With the approval of the governor, The attorney
general may appoint assistant attorneys general necessary
for the efficient operation of his office. Each assistant
attorney general shall be a member in good standing of the
Wyoming bar and shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney
general. The assistants shall act under the direction of
the attorney general and his deputies. The attorney
general, his deputies or his assistants may appear in any
courts of the state or the United States and prosecute or
defend on behalf of the state. An appearance by the
attorney general or his staff does not waive the sovereign
immunity of the state.

(b) With the approval of the governor The attorney
general may appoint special assistant attorneys general for
any purposes. A person shall not be employed as an attorney
or legal counsel by any department, board, agency,
commission or institution of the state, or represent the
state in that capacity, except by the written appointment
of the attorney general. Written appointment of the
attorney general shall not be required for the employment
of legal counsel by elected state officials.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
9-1-611. Division of criminal investigation; created;
definitions; director; appointment; qualifications.

(c) With the approval of the governor, The attorney
general shall appoint a director who is the chief
administrative officer and chief agent of the division.

9-1-618. Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers;
general assistance to state, county or local authorities;
investigative duties.

(b) The division shall investigate:

(i) Suspected criminal activity when directed by
the governor attorney general to do so;

9-1-633. Wyoming law enforcement academy; director;
appointment; term; qualifications; employees; salaries;
curriculum and training programs; fees; disposition.

(a) A director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy
shall be appointed by the attorney general with the consent
of the governor. The director shall serve at the pleasure
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
of the attorney general. He The director shall have
administrative and operational experience in criminal
justice and such other qualifications as are satisfactory
to the attorney general governor.

(b) The director may employ assistants, instructors
and other personnel as approved by the attorney general.
with the consent of the governor. The attorney general may
appoint the director as a peace officer, if qualified
pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707. The director may
appoint full-time staff instructors who qualify pursuant to
W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 to perform as peace officers.
Persons appointed as peace officers pursuant to this
subsection shall be considered peace officers only:

9-1-636. Division of victim services; created;
appointment of director and deputy director; administrative
and clerical employees; definitions.

(b) With the approval of the governor, The attorney
general shall appoint a director who is the chief
administrative officer of the division. The director is
responsible to the attorney general for the operation of
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
the division and shall serve at the pleasure of the
attorney general.

(c) With the consent of the attorney general and the
governor, and subject to legislative appropriation, the
director may:

9-2-3204. General services division.

(h) The general services division shall:

(i) Manage and control all state motor vehicles
and equipment including their identification, purchase,
lease, replacement, repair and permanent assignment, except
for state owned or leased vehicles personally used by or
assigned to the governor, secretary of state, state
auditor, state treasurer, attorney general or
superintendent of public instruction;

9-3-101. Salaries; amount; date of payment.

(a) Salaries for clerk of the supreme court and
district court reporters shall be determined by the supreme
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
court as authorized by legislative appropriations. Subject
to constitutional limitations the following state officers
and members of the judiciary shall receive the salaries
indicated by the figures following their respective titles:

(viii) Attorney General $175,000.00.

9-4-218. Federal natural resource policy account
created; purposes.

(a) There is created an account known as the "federal
natural resource policy account." Funds within the account
may be expended by the governor on behalf of the state of
Wyoming and its local governments, to take any of the
actions specified in this subsection related to federal
land, water, air, mineral and other natural resource
policies which may affect the tax base of the state,
wildlife management, state species, recreation, private
property rights, water rights or leasehold rights. Funds
also may be expended for preparing and participating in
environmental impact statements and environmental
assessments, including analysis of economic or social and
natural or physical environmental effects on the human
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
environment. Funds also may be expended for coordinating
and participating in rangeland health assessments pursuant
to W.S. 11-2-207. The governor may expend funds from the
federal natural resource policy account for:

(iii) Investigating, initiating, intervening or
otherwise participating in litigation, or taking any other
legal action by the state, a state agency or the counties
of the state individually or jointly, that furthers the
purposes of this subsection. In carrying out this
subsection, the attorney general, or the counties, with
approval of the governor, may retain qualified practicing
attorneys to act for the state or the counties, including
providing representation in other forums with the federal
government or other state or county governments that may
preclude or resolve any outstanding issues or attempting to
influence pertinent federal legislation;

9-13-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(xii) "Public employee" means any of the
following state employees:

(A) The attorney general and the director
of any department of the executive branch appointed by the
governor under W.S. 9-2-1706, or the director of any
legislative agency;

(xvi) "State office" means the state offices of
governor, treasurer, superintendent of public instruction,
auditor, secretary of state, attorney general and member of
the state legislature;

9-13-108. Disclosure required.

(a) Not later than January 31 annually, each of the
state's five (5) six (6) elected officials and each member
of the Wyoming legislature shall file a financial
disclosure form with the secretary of state. The form shall
be signed by the elected official or legislator filing it
and under a certification that it is accurate. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, the financial
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
disclosure form shall contain the following information
current as of January 15 of that year:

9-14-101. Second amendment defense.

The attorney general may seek to intervene or file an
amicus curiae brief in any lawsuit filed in any state or
federal court in Wyoming, or filed against any Wyoming
citizen or firm in any other jurisdiction for damages for
injuries as a result of the use of fire arms firearms that
are not defective, if in his judgment, the action endangers
the constitutional right of citizens of Wyoming to keep and
bear arms. The attorney general is directed to advance
arguments that protect the constitutional right to bear
arms. Before intervening in any lawsuit pursuant to this
section, the attorney general shall obtain the approval of
the governor.

9-14-102. Unauthorized federal agency actions.

(c) The attorney general may seek to take action
before the federal environmental protection agency, the
federal occupational safety and health administration or
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
any other federal agency or in any state or federal court
to stop the enforcement, administration or implementation
of rulemaking or other actions taken by those agencies any
federal agency if, in his judgment, the rulemaking or other
action exceeds the authority granted by the United States
congress or otherwise rests on questionable authority.
Before intervening in or initiating any lawsuit pursuant to
this section, the attorney general shall obtain the
approval of the governor.

18-3-902. Attorney general to commence action;
petition served with summons; pleading; trial; judgment;
change of judge.

(a) Whenever it appears to the governor attorney
general on the verified complaint of qualified electors or
the board of county commissioners of the county that any
county officer is guilty of misconduct or malfeasance in
office, he may direct the attorney general to may commence
and prosecute an action in the district court of the county
in which the officer is an official asking for the removal
of the officer. The action shall be commenced by the filing
of a verified petition in the name of the state of Wyoming
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
signed by the attorney general setting forth the facts
constituting the misconduct or malfeasance in office.

22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.

(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress or the board of
trustees of a school or community college district, shall
be filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided
in this section, by appointment of a temporary successor.
Subject to W.S. 28-12-101(b) with respect to the office of
attorney general, the person appointed shall serve until a
successor for the remainder of the unexpired term is
elected at the next general election and takes office on
the first Monday of the following January. Provided, if a
vacancy in a four (4) year term of office occurs in the
term's second or subsequent years after the first day for
filing an application for nomination pursuant to W.S.
22-5-209, no election to fill the vacancy shall be held and
the temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder
of the unexpired term. The following apply:

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(i) If a vacancy occurs in the office of United
States senator or in any state office other than the
governor, member of the state legislature, the office of
justice of the supreme court and the office of district
court judge, the governor shall immediately notify in
writing the chairman of the state central committee of the
political party which the last incumbent represented at the
time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the
time of his appointment if not elected to office. The
chairman shall call a meeting of the state central
committee to be held not later than fifteen (15) days after
he receives notice of the vacancy. At the meeting the
state central committee shall select and transmit to the
governor the names of three (3) persons qualified to hold
the office. Within five (5) days after receiving these
three (3) names, the governor shall fill the vacancy by
temporary appointment of one (1) of the three (3) to hold
the office. If the incumbent who has vacated office did
not represent a political party at the time of his
election, or at the time of his appointment if not elected
to office, the governor shall notify in writing the
chairman of all state central committees of parties
registered with the secretary of state. The state central
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
committees shall submit to the governor, within fifteen
(15) days after notice of the vacancy, the name of one (1)
person qualified to hold the office. The governor shall
also cause to be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the state notice of the vacancy in office.
Persons qualified to hold the office who do not belong to a
party may, within fifteen (15) days after publication of
the vacancy in office, submit a petition signed by one
hundred (100) registered voters, seeking consideration for
appointment to the office. Within five (5) days after
receiving the names of persons qualified to hold the
office, the governor shall fill the vacancy by temporary
appointment to the office, from the names submitted or from
those petitioning for appointment or in the case of the
office of the attorney general, the governor shall submit a
name or fill the vacancy in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101;

28-1-115. Submission of state agency plans to
legislature; contents; purposes.

(g) For purposes of this section and W.S. 28-1-116,
"state agency" means:

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
(ii) Offices of the five (5) elected state
officials and the governor, secretary of state, state
auditor, state treasurer, attorney general and state
superintendent of public instruction; and

28-12-102. Senate consideration of gubernatorial
appointments; procedure; roll call vote required.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, if the senate does not consent to a nominee for a
given office, the governor shall submit the name, address
and biography of another person for senate consideration if
the legislature is still in session. If the legislature has
adjourned, the governor may make a temporary appointment as
provided in W.S. 28-12-101(b). No person rejected by the
senate shall be appointed to or serve in, either
temporarily or otherwise, the public office for which his
nomination was rejected.

(d) If the senate does not consent to a nominee to
fill a vacancy in the office of attorney general submitted
by the governor pursuant to W.S. 22-18-111(a)(i), the
governor shall submit the name of another person from those
HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
provided pursuant to W.S. 22-18-111(a)(i) for senate
consideration if the legislature is still in session. If
there are no qualified persons remaining for consideration
then the process outlined in W.S. 22-18-111(a)(i) shall
begin again. No person rejected by the senate under this
section shall be appointed to serve in the office of
attorney general. If the legislature has adjourned, the
governor shall make a temporary appointment as provided in
W.S. 28-12-101(b) from persons whose names are submitted
pursuant to W.S. 22-18-111(a)(i).

35-7-1004. Personnel to administer provisions.

The attorney general by and with the consent of the
governor may employ such personnel as necessary to
administer this act. Such personnel shall serve at the
pleasure of the attorney general at such compensation as
may be approved by the Wyoming personnel division. Said
personnel shall be assigned such duties as may be necessary
to assist the commissioner in the performance of his
responsibilities under this act for the efficient operation
of the work of the office.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
35-11-1507. Injunction proceedings; penalties.

(a) When, in the opinion of the governor attorney
general, a person is violating or is about to violate any
provision of this article, the governor attorney general
shall direct the attorney general to apply to the
appropriate court for an order enjoining the person from
engaging or continuing to engage in the activity. Upon a
showing that the person has engaged, or is about to engage
in the activity, the court may grant a permanent or
temporary injunction, restraining order or other order.

35-21-110. Statewide protection order registry.

(a) The Wyoming attorney general or another agency
designated by the governor shall establish a statewide
registry of protection orders related to domestic violence
and shall maintain a complete and systematic record and
index of all valid temporary and final civil and criminal
court orders of protection.

HB0102

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0396
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Section 2 of this act is effective January 4,
2027.

(END)
HB0102